Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Chapter 61 Mergers, Membership Exchanges, Entity Conversions, and For-Profit Conversions
48-61-112. Articles of entity conversion.

After the conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a domestic unincorporated entity has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, articles of entity conversion shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall:

Set forth the name of the corporation immediately before the filing of the articles of entity conversion and the name to which the name of the corporation is to be changed, which shall be a name that satisfies the organic law of the survivor;

State the type of unincorporated entity that the survivor will be;

Set forth a statement that the plan of entity conversion was duly approved by the members in the manner required by this chapter and the charter;

If the survivor is a filing entity, have attached the applicable public organic document; except that provisions that would not be required to be included in a restated public organic document may be omitted; and

If the corporation is a public benefit corporation, have a statement that notice of the plan of entity conversion was given to the attorney general and reporter in the manner required by § 48-61-123 and that either:

The plan of entity conversion was approved by order of a court of record of this state; or

The corporation received a written statement of no enforcement intent with respect to the plan from the attorney general and reporter.

After the conversion of a domestic unincorporated entity to a domestic nonprofit corporation has been adopted and approved as required by the organic law of the unincorporated entity, articles of entity conversion shall be executed on behalf of the unincorporated entity by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall:

Set forth the name of the unincorporated entity immediately before the filing of the articles of entity conversion and the name to which the name of the unincorporated entity is to be changed, which shall be a name that satisfies the requirements of § 48-54-101;

Set forth a statement that the plan of entity conversion was duly approved in accordance with the organic law of the unincorporated entity; and

Have attached a charter; except that provisions that would not be required to be included in a restated charter of a domestic nonprofit corporation may be omitted.

After the conversion of a foreign unincorporated entity to a domestic nonprofit corporation has been authorized as required by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction, articles of entity conversion shall be executed on behalf of the foreign unincorporated entity by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall:

Set forth the name of the unincorporated entity immediately before the filing of the articles of entity conversion and the name to which the name of the unincorporated entity is to be changed, which shall be a name that satisfies the requirements of § 48-54-101;

Set forth the jurisdiction under the laws of which the unincorporated entity was organized immediately before the filing of the articles of entity conversion and the date on which the unincorporated entity was organized in that jurisdiction;

Set forth a statement that the conversion of the unincorporated entity was duly approved in the manner required by its organic law; and

Have attached a charter; except that provisions that would not be required to be included in a restated charter of a domestic nonprofit corporation may be omitted.

The articles of entity conversion shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, together with the required filing fee, and shall take effect at the effective time provided in § 48-51-304. Articles of entity conversion filed under subsection (a) or (b) may be combined with any required conversion filing under the organic law of the domestic unincorporated entity if the combined filing satisfies the requirements of both this section and the other organic law. The public organic document required by subsection (a) to be attached shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, and shall take effect at the effective time of the articles of entity conversion. A filing fee for the public organic document shall be paid to the secretary of state in the amount specified for such public organic document by the applicable law governing the formation of such domestic unincorporated entity. The charter required by subsection (b) or (c) to be attached shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, and shall take effect at the effective time of the articles of entity conversion. A filing fee for the charter shall be paid in accordance with § 48-51-303.

If the converting entity is a foreign unincorporated entity that is authorized to transact business in this state under a provision of law similar to chapter 65 of this title, its certificate of authority or other type of foreign qualification shall be cancelled automatically on the effective date of its conversion.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-113. Entity conversion of domestic nonprofit corporation to foreign unincorporated entity — Articles of charter surrender.

Whenever a domestic nonprofit corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required by this chapter, a plan of entity conversion providing for the corporation to be converted to a foreign unincorporated entity, articles of charter surrender shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles of charter surrender shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

A statement that the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection with the conversion of the corporation to a foreign unincorporated entity;

A statement that the conversion was duly approved by the members or the board of directors or otherwise in the manner required by this chapter and the charter;

The jurisdiction under the laws of which the survivor will be organized; and

If the survivor will be a nonfiling entity, the address of its executive office immediately after the conversion.

The articles of charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to the secretary of state for filing together with the required filing fee. The articles of charter surrender shall take effect on the effective time provided in § 48-51-304.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-114. Effect of entity conversion.

When a conversion under § 48-61-111 takes effect:

All title to real and personal property, both tangible and intangible, of the converting entity remains in the survivor without reversion or impairment;

All obligations and liabilities of the converting entity continue as obligations and liabilities of the survivor;

An action or proceeding pending against the converting entity continues against the survivor as if the conversion had not occurred;

In the case of a survivor that is a filing entity, its charter or public organic documents and its private organic documents become effective;

In the case of a survivor that is a nonfiling entity, its private organic documents become effective;

The memberships or interests of the converting entity are reclassified into memberships, interests, other securities, obligations, rights to acquire memberships, interests, or other securities, or into cash or other property in accordance with the plan of conversion; and the members or interest holders of the converting entity are entitled only to the rights provided to them under the terms of the conversion and to any appraisal rights they may have under the applicable organic law of the converting entity if it is other than a corporation; and

The survivor is deemed to:

Be incorporated or organized under and subject to the organic law of the converting entity for all purposes;

Be the same corporation or unincorporated entity without interruption as the converting entity; and

Have been incorporated or otherwise organized on the date that the converting entity was originally incorporated or organized.

When a conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a foreign other entity becomes effective, the surviving entity is deemed to:

Appoint the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in a proceeding to enforce the rights of members or interest holders who exercise appraisal rights that they may have under the applicable organic law of the converting entity if it is other than a corporation in connection with the conversion; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such members are entitled under the applicable law of the converting entity if it is other than a corporation.

A member who becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations, or liabilities of the survivor shall be personally liable only for those debts, obligations, or liabilities of the survivor that arise after the effective time of the articles of entity conversion.

The owner liability of an interest holder in an unincorporated entity that converts to a domestic nonprofit corporation shall be as follows:

The conversion does not discharge any owner liability under the organic law of the unincorporated entity to the extent any such owner liability arose before the effective time of the articles of entity conversion;

The interest holder shall not have owner liability under the organic law of the unincorporated entity for any debt, obligation, or liability of the corporation that arises after the effective time of the articles of entity conversion;

The organic law of the unincorporated entity shall continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision (d)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred; and

The interest holder shall have whatever rights of contribution from other interest holders are provided by the organic law of the unincorporated entity with respect to any owner liability preserved by subdivision (d)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred.

The converting entity shall not be required to wind up its affairs or pay its liabilities and distribute its assets, and such conversion shall not be deemed to constitute a dissolution of such entity.

The interests of the interest holders of the converting entity, unless otherwise agreed, shall be cancelled and become of no effect whatsoever, with respect to the survivor, and the former holders of such interests shall be entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of conversion or the organic documents for the conversion of memberships into interests in the survivor.

A conversion shall take effect upon the date the articles of conversion are filed, as provided in § 48-61-112, or on such later date as may be specified in the plan of conversion.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, this section and § 48-61-109 shall have no effect on the application of title 67 and other state and federal tax statutes. Any tax consequences of the conversion as referenced herein shall continue to be controlled by applicable state and federal tax statutes as they may be amended from time to time.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-115. Abandonment of plan of entity conversion — Filing of statement of abandonment.

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of entity conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by § 48-61-111, and at any time before the entity conversion has become effective, it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the members.

If an entity conversion is abandoned after articles of entity conversion or articles of charter surrender have been filed with the secretary of state but before the entity conversion has become effective, a statement that the entity conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section, executed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, together with the required filing fee, prior to the effective date of the entity conversion. Upon filing, the statement shall take effect and the entity conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-116. Plan of for-profit conversion — Contents of plan

Subject to the limitations on public benefit corporations in § 48-61-122, a domestic nonprofit corporation may become a domestic business corporation pursuant to a plan of for-profit conversion.

Subject to the limitations on public benefit corporations in § 48-61-122, a domestic nonprofit corporation may become a foreign business corporation if the for-profit conversion is permitted by the laws of the foreign jurisdiction. Regardless of whether the laws of the foreign jurisdiction require the adoption of a plan of for-profit conversion, the foreign for-profit conversion shall be approved by the adoption by the domestic nonprofit corporation of a plan of for-profit conversion in the manner provided in this section.

The plan of for-profit conversion must include:

The terms and conditions of the conversion;

The manner and basis of:

Issuing at least one (1) share in the corporation following its conversion, and

Reclassifying the memberships of the corporation following its conversion into shares, if any, or securities, obligations, rights to acquire shares or securities, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing;

Any desired amendments to or restatements of the charter or organic documents of the corporation following its conversion; and

If the domestic nonprofit corporation is to be converted to a foreign for-profit corporation, a statement of the jurisdiction in which the corporation will be incorporated after the conversion.

The plan of for-profit conversion may also include a provision that the plan may be amended prior to filing articles of for-profit conversion, except that subsequent to approval of the plan by the members the plan may not be amended to change:

The amount or kind of shares or securities, obligations, rights to acquire shares or securities, cash, or other property to be received by the members under the plan;

The charter as it will be in effect immediately following the conversion, except for changes permitted by § 48-60-102; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect any of the members in any material respect.

Terms of a plan of for-profit conversion may be made dependent upon facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with § 48-51-301.

If any debt security, note or similar evidence of indebtedness for money borrowed, whether secured or unsecured, or a contract of any kind, issued, incurred or executed by a domestic nonprofit corporation before January 1, 2015, contains a provision applying to a merger of the corporation and the document does not refer to a for-profit conversion of the corporation, the provision shall be deemed to apply to a for-profit conversion of the corporation until such time as the provision is amended on or subsequent to January 1, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-117. Approval of conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a domestic or foreign for-profit corporation.

In the case of a conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a domestic or foreign for-profit corporation:

The plan of for-profit conversion must be adopted by the board of directors;

After adopting the plan of nonprofit conversion, the board of directors must submit the plan to the members for their approval if there are members entitled to vote on the plan. The board of directors must also transmit to the members a recommendation that the members approve the plan, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors must transmit to the members the basis for that determination;

The board of directors may condition its submission of the plan of for-profit conversion to the members on any basis;

If the approval of the members is to be given at a meeting, the corporation must notify each member of the meeting of members at which the plan of for-profit conversion is to be submitted for approval. The notice must state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and must contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. The notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy of the charter as it will be in effect immediately after the for-profit conversion and full text copy of the bylaws and other organic documents as they will be in effect immediately after the for-profit conversion;

Unless chapters 51-68 of this title, the charter, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subdivision (3) requires a greater vote or a vote by voting groups, the plan of for-profit conversion to be authorized must be approved by each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan by a majority of all the votes entitled to be cast on the plan by that voting group; and

If any provision of the charter, bylaws, or an agreement to which any of the directors or members are parties, adopted or entered into before January 1, 2015, applies to a merger of the corporation and the document does not refer to a for-profit conversion of the corporation, the provision shall be deemed to apply to a for-profit conversion of the corporation until such time as the provision is amended on or subsequent to January 1, 2015.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-118. Articles of for-profit conversion — Contents.

After a plan of for-profit conversion providing for the conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a domestic business corporation has been adopted and approved as required by this chapter, articles of for-profit conversion shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall set forth:

The name of the corporation immediately before the filing of the articles of for-profit conversion and if that name does not satisfy the requirements of § 48-14-101, or the corporation desires to change its name in connection with the conversion, a name that satisfies the requirements of § 48-14-101;

A statement that the plan of for-profit conversion was duly approved by the members in the manner required by this chapter and the charter if there are members entitled to vote on the plan or, if there are no members entitled to vote on the plan, by the board of directors in the manner required by this chapter and the charter; and

If the corporation is a public benefit corporation, a statement that notice of the plan of for-profit conversion was given to the attorney general and reporter in the manner required by § 48-61-123 and that either:

The plan of for-profit conversion was approved by order of a court of record of this state; or

The corporation received a written statement of no enforcement intent with respect to the plan from the attorney general and reporter.

The articles of for-profit conversion shall have attached a charter that satisfies the requirements of § 48-12-102. Provisions that would not be required to be included in a charter of a domestic business corporation may be omitted.

The articles of for-profit conversion shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, together with the required filing fee, and shall take effect at the effective time provided in § 48-51-304. The attached charter shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing and a fee therefor shall be paid in accordance with § 48-11-303.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-119. Conversion of domestic nonprofit corporation to foreign for-profit corporation — Articles of charter surrender.

Whenever a domestic nonprofit corporation has adopted and approved, in the manner required by this chapter, a plan of for-profit conversion providing for the corporation to be converted to a foreign for-profit corporation, articles of charter surrender shall be executed on behalf of the corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles of charter surrender shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

A statement that the articles of charter surrender are being filed in connection with the conversion of the corporation to a foreign for-profit corporation;

A statement that the foreign for-profit conversion was duly approved by the members in the manner required by this section and the charter; and

The corporation's new jurisdiction of incorporation.

The articles of charter surrender shall be delivered by the corporation to the secretary of state for filing together with the required filing fee in accordance with § 48-51-303. The articles of charter surrender shall take effect on the effective time provided in § 48-51-304.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-120. Effect of for-profit conversion.

When a conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a domestic business corporation becomes effective:

The title to all real and personal property, both tangible and intangible, of the corporation remains in the corporation without reversion or impairment;

The liabilities of the corporation remain the liabilities of the corporation;

An action or proceeding pending against the corporation continues against the corporation as if the conversion had not occurred;

The charter of the domestic or foreign for-profit corporation becomes effective;

The memberships of the corporation are reclassified into shares, interests, securities, obligations, rights to acquire shares or securities, or into cash or other property in accordance with the plan of for-profit conversion, and the members are entitled only to the rights provided in the plan of for-profit conversion or to any rights they may have under charter or organic documents of the corporation; and

The corporation is deemed to:

Be a domestic business corporation for all purposes;

Be the same corporation without interruption as the corporation that existed prior to the conversion; and

Have been incorporated on the date it was originally incorporated as a domestic nonprofit corporation.

When a conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation to a foreign for-profit corporation becomes effective, the foreign for-profit corporation is deemed to:

Appoint the secretary of state as its agent for service of process in a proceeding to enforce the rights of members who exercise appraisal rights in connection with the conversion; and

Agree that it will promptly pay the amount, if any, to which such members are entitled under the charter or organic documents of the corporation.

The owner liability of a member in a domestic nonprofit corporation that converts to a domestic business corporation shall be as follows:

The conversion does not discharge any owner liability of the member as a member of the nonprofit corporation to the extent any such owner liability arose before the effective time of the articles of for-profit conversion;

The member shall not have owner liability for any debt, obligation, or liability of the for-profit corporation that arises after the effective time of the articles of for-profit conversion;

The laws of this state shall continue to apply to the collection or discharge of any owner liability preserved by subdivision (c)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred and the business corporation were still a nonprofit corporation; and

The member shall have whatever rights of contribution from other members are provided by the laws of this state with respect to any owner liability preserved by subdivision (c)(1), as if the conversion had not occurred and the business corporation was still a nonprofit corporation.

A member who becomes subject to owner liability for some or all of the debts, obligations, or liabilities of the business corporation shall have owner liability only for those debts, obligations, or liabilities of the business corporation that arise after the effective time of the articles of for-profit conversion.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-121. Abandonment of for-profit conversion — Filing of statement of abandonment.

Unless otherwise provided in a plan of for-profit conversion of a domestic nonprofit corporation, after the plan has been adopted and approved as required by this section, and at any time before the for-profit conversion has become effective, it may be abandoned by the board of directors without action by the members.

If a for-profit conversion is abandoned under subsection (a) after articles of for-profit conversion or articles of charter surrender have been filed with the secretary of state but before the for-profit conversion has become effective, a statement that the for-profit conversion has been abandoned in accordance with this section, executed by an officer or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the secretary of state for filing, together with the required filing fee, prior to the effective date of the for-profit conversion. The statement shall take effect upon filing, and the for-profit conversion shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-122. Limitations on entities with which a public benefit corporation may be a party to a merger, membership exchange, entity conversion or for-profit conversion transaction.

Without the prior approval of a court of record of this state having equity jurisdiction in a proceeding of which the attorney general and reporter has been given written notice of a plan of merger or membership exchange, a plan of entity conversion, or a plan of for-profit conversion in accordance with § 48-61-123; or unless the attorney general and reporter, after receiving written notice to the attorney general in accordance with § 48-61-123, has issued a written statement of no enforcement intent with respect to the plan, a public benefit corporation may be a party to a merger, membership exchange, entity conversion or for-profit conversion transaction described in this chapter only with:

A domestic nonprofit public benefit corporation;

A foreign nonprofit corporation which would qualify under chapters 51-68 of this title as a public benefit corporation;

A foreign or domestic corporation for profit; provided, that the public benefit corporation is the surviving corporation and continues to be a public benefit corporation after the transaction; or

A foreign or domestic corporation for profit that is the surviving corporation; provided that:

On or prior to the effective date of the transaction, assets with a value equal to the greater of the fair market value of the net tangible and intangible assets (including good will) of the public benefit corporation, or the fair market value of the public benefit corporation if it were to be operated as a business concern, are transferred or conveyed to one (1) or more persons who would have received its assets under § 48-64-106(a)(5) and (a)(6) had it dissolved;

It shall return, transfer or convey any assets held by it upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the transaction, in accordance with such condition;

The transaction is approved by a majority of directors of the public benefit corporation who are not and will not become shareholders in or officers, employees, agents or consultants of the for-profit corporation; and

A copy of the plan of transaction is submitted to the attorney general and reporter not less than forty-five (45) days prior to the effective date of the transaction.

A public benefit corporation must give written notice to the attorney general and reporter in accordance with § 48-61-123.

In a transaction to which subdivisions (a)(1), (a)(2) or (a)(3) applies, when a public benefit corporation with members consummates the transaction, each member of the public benefit corporation may only receive or keep a membership or membership interest in the surviving public benefit corporation if the surviving public benefit corporation has memberships or membership interests in accordance with the plan.

Unless a public benefit corporation that is a party to a transaction under this chapter has obtained an order of a court of record in this state having equity jurisdiction to the extent required by the law of this state regarding cy pres or otherwise dealing with the nondiversion of charitable assets, the transaction may not alter, amend, or change the following:

Any restriction or limitation imposed on the public benefit corporation by its documents that may not be altered, amended or changed by its officers, board of directors, members or interest holders;

Any restriction imposed on any assets or property held by the public benefit corporation by virtue of any trust under which it holds the assets or property; or

The existing rights and interests of persons other than members or interest holders in the public benefit corporation.

In any transaction in which a public corporation is a party to a merger, membership exchange, entity conversion or for-profit conversion transaction under this chapter, the public benefit corporation must comply with § 48-62-103(a) with respect to the corporation's assets and property.

A person who is a member, interest holder or is otherwise affiliated with a public benefit corporation or an unincorporated entity with a charitable purpose may not receive a direct or indirect financial benefit in connection with a transaction under this chapter to which the public benefit corporation is a party unless the party is itself a public benefit corporation or a charitable corporation or unincorporated entity with a charitable purpose. This subsection (f) does not apply to the receipt of reasonable compensation for services rendered.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-123. Public benefit corporation to provide notice to attorney general and reporter of intent to consummate any merger, membership exchange, or conversions — Time after notice for consummation of transaction.

A public benefit corporation shall give the attorney general and reporter written notice that it intends to consummate any merger, membership exchange or conversions. The notice shall include a copy or summary of the plan of merger, membership exchange or conversion.

No merger, membership exchange or conversion shall be consummated, including any transfer of assets until forty-five (45) days after it has given the written notice required by subsection (a) to the attorney general and reporter or until the attorney general and reporter has consented in writing to, or indicated in writing that the attorney general and reporter will take no action in respect to, the transfer or conveyance, whichever is earlier.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.

48-61-124. Bequests, devises and gifts.

Any bequest, devise, gift, grant, or promise contained in a will or other instrument of donation, subscription, or conveyance, which is made to a corporation that is a party to a transaction under this chapter and which takes effect or remains payable after the transaction, inures to the surviving entity with a charitable purpose unless the will or other instrument otherwise specifically provides.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 72.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 61, §§ 48-61-101 — 48-61-107 (Acts 1987, ch. 242, §§ 11.01-11.07), concerning merger, was repealed and reenacted by Acts 2014, ch. 899, §§ 65-72, effective January 1, 2015.